Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 4. Reduction to Optimum Number of Entry Permits.

Sec. 16.43.290.
Optimum number of entry permits.

Following the issuance of entry permits under AS

16.43.270

, the commission shall establish the optimum number of entry permits for each fishery based upon a reasonable balance of the following general standards:

the number of entry permits sufficient to maintain an economically healthy fishery that will result in a reasonable average rate of economic return to the fishermen participating in that fishery, considering time fished and necessary investments in vessels and gear;

the number of entry permits necessary to harvest the allowable commercial take of the fishery resource during all years in an orderly, efficient manner, and consistent with sound fishery management techniques;

the number of entry permits sufficient to avoid serious economic hardship to those currently engaged in the fishery, considering other economic opportunities reasonably available to them.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For optimum numbers of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 11.

Sec. 16.43.300.
Revisions of optimum number of entry permits.

The commission may increase or decrease the optimum number of entry permits for a fishery when one or more of the following conditions makes a change desirable considering the purposes of this chapter:

an established long-term change in the biological condition of the fishery has occurred that substantially alters the optimum number of entry permits permissible applying the standards set out in AS

16.43.290

;

an established long-term change in market conditions has occurred, directly affecting the fishery, that substantially alters the optimum number of entry permits permissible under the standards set out in AS

16.43.290

.

If the commission decreases the optimum number of entry permits for a fishery, the number of entry permits may be reduced only under the voluntary buy-back provisions set out in AS

16.43.310

and

16.43.320

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973)

Sec. 16.43.310.
Establishment of buy-back funds and permit buy-back assessments.

When the optimum number of entry permits is less than the number of entry permits outstanding in a fishery, the commission may establish a buy-back program, a buy-back plan, and a buy-back fund for that fishery.

The commission may establish by regulation a permit buy-back assessment for each fishery for which the commission has established a buy-back fund under (a) of this section. The amount of the assessment may not exceed seven percent of the value, as defined in AS

43.75.290

, of fish that a permit holder in the fishery subject to the assessment removes from the state or transfers to a buyer in the state. The Department of Revenue shall collect an assessment established under this subsection.

The commission shall expend money appropriated to a buy-back fund for the purpose of reducing the number of entry permits in the fishery to the optimum number, at a rate to be established by the commission. The legislature may appropriate interest accrued on the money in a buy-back fund to that fund. Except as provided in AS

16.43.320

, money appropriated to a buy-back fund does not lapse.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 5 ch 135 SLA 2002)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The provisions of this section (under former law) and AS

16.43.320

(under former law), which authorize the Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission to establish and administer a buy-back program, offend the state constitutional prohibition against dedicated funds. May 23, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.43.320.
Administration of the buy-back program.

The commission shall adopt regulations providing for the purchase of transferable entry permits with money in the buy-back fund for each fishery. The commission shall cease purchases of entry permits in a fishery when the number of entry permits in the fishery has been reduced to the optimum number. The commission shall terminate a buy-back assessment established for a fishery under AS

16.43.310(b)

when the commission determines that the amount of revenue collected through the assessment is sufficient to purchase the number of entry permits necessary to achieve the optimum number of entry permits in the fishery and to offset the reasonable costs of the buy-back program for the fishery, including repayment of any debt the commission was authorized to incur to capitalize the buy-back fund for the fishery. The unexpended balance of appropriations made to a buy-back fund for a fishery shall lapse back into the fund from which the money was appropriated at the end of the fiscal year in which the buy-back program is terminated.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 6 ch 135 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 2004)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The provisions of
AS

16.43.310

(under former law) and this section (under former law), which authorize the Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission to establish and administer a buy-back program, offend the state constitutional prohibition against dedicated funds. May 23, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.43.330.
Issuance of new entry permits; appropriations related to fleet reduction.

When the number of outstanding entry permits for a fishery is less than the optimum number established under AS

16.43.290

, the commission shall issue new entry permits to applicants who are presently able to engage actively in the fishery until the optimum number is reached.

The commission shall determine equitable methods of issuance, as appropriate, under (a) of this section that assure the receipt of fair market value for the permits issued.

If a salmon fishery association qualified under AS

16.40.250

takes part in a fleet reduction program by expending money or incurring debt to contract with permit holders to relinquish the holders’ entry permits under AS

16.43.150(i)

, and if this section requires additional permits to be issued for the same fishery in which the fleet reduction program was implemented, the legislature may appropriate any resulting revenue to the association for reimbursement of money expended or to retire any outstanding debt incurred for fleet reduction purposes. An appropriation under this subsection must be made within 30 years after the date the money was expended or debt incurred.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 2006)

Secs. 16.43.335 — 16.43.339.
[Renumbered as AS 16.43.400
— 16.43.420.]